Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Reports.

§79-4-16.20.
Financial statements for shareholders.

A corporation shall furnish its shareholders annual financial statements, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year, an income statement for that year, and a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for the year unless that information appears elsewhere in the financial statements. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements must also be prepared on that basis.

If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, his report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s accounting records:

Stating his reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

A corporation shall deliver the annual financial statements to each shareholder within one hundred twenty (120) days after the close of each fiscal year. Thereafter, on written request from a shareholder to whom the statements were not delivered, the corporation shall send the shareholder the latest financial statements. A public corporation may fulfill its responsibilities under this section by delivering the specified financial statements, or otherwise making them available, in any manner permitted by the applicable rules and regulations of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.20; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 14; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 46, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment rewrote (c).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (c), substituted “send the shareholder” for “mail him” preceding “the latest financial statements” at the end of the next-to-last sentence, and added the last sentence.

Requirement that corporation keep copy of all financial statements furnished to shareholders under this section for past 3 years at its principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders. 48 A.L.R.5th 389.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 284, 330.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1032-74:1034.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 588-601.

§79-4-16.21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 48, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-16.21. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.21; brought forward, Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1997.]

Former § 79-4-16.21 pertained to the reporting of the indemnification of or expense advances to a director in connection with a proceeding and certain issues of shares by the corporation.

§79-4-16.22.
Annual report to secretary of state.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, shall deliver within sixty (60) days of each anniversary date of its incorporation with respect to a domestic corporation or its authorization to transact business in this state with respect to a foreign corporation, or such other date as may be established by the Secretary of State, to the Secretary of State for filing an annual report that sets forth:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

The address of its principal office;

The names and business addresses of its directors and principal officers;

A brief description of the nature of its business;

The total number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series, if any, within each class; and

The total number of issued and outstanding shares, itemized by class and series, if any, within each class.

Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall notify promptly the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and delivered to the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 16.22; Laws, 1992, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 51, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Laws of 1992, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 1, 1993, provides that every domestic corporation, and every foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall deliver an annual report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days of the date of the anniversary date of its incorporation if it is a domestic corporation or its authorization to transact business in this state if it is a foreign corporation, or on such other date as may be established by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State has determined that the 1997 annual reports shall continue to be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and April 1, 1997.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “[see Editor’s Note below]” following “established by the Secretary of State” near the end of (a); and substituted “information required by Section 79-35-5(a)” for “address of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state” in (a)(2).

Requirement that most recent annual report required by this section have been delivered to Secretary of State in order for certificate of existence or authorization to be issued, see § 79-4-1.28.

Corporation’s failure to deliver its annual report to Secretary of State as grounds for administrative dissolution, see § 79-4-14.20.

Requirement that corporation keep copy of its most recent annual report delivered to Secretary of State under this section at its principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

Annual report required by this section to include statement that all shareholders are qualified persons with respect to corporation or if foreign professional corporation, that all shareholders meet § 79-10-91(2)(c) requirement, see § 79-10-101.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

Right of stockholder to have corporate books inspected by attorney, accountant, or other agent without stockholder’s presence. 48 A.L.R.3d 1072.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder’s right to inspection. 88 A.L.R.3d 663.

Availability of sole shareholder’s Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination to resist production of corporation’s books and records – modern status. 87 A.L.R. Fed. 177.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 284.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1612-1617.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2393.